Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB160.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 199.896 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] person, association, or organization shall not conduct, operate, maintain, or
advertise any child-care center without obtaining a license as provided in KRS
199.892 to 199.896.
(2) The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance
with[pursuant to] KRS Chapter 13A relating to license fees and may, in the
administrative regulations, establish standards of care and service for a child-care
center, criteria for the denial of a license if criminal records indicate convictions
that may impact the safety and security of children in care, and procedures for
enforcement of penalties which are not in contravention of this section.
(3) Each initial application for a license shall be made to the cabinet and shall be
accompanied by a fee that shall not exceed administrative costs of the program to
the cabinet and shall be renewable annually upon expiration and reapplication when
accompanied by a renewal fee that shall not exceed administrative costs of the
program to the cabinet. Regular licenses and renewals thereof shall expire one (1)
year from their effective date.
(4) A[No] child-care center shall not be refused a license or have its license revoked for
failure to meet standards set by the secretary until after the expiration of a period
not to exceed six (6) months from the date of the first official notice that the
standards have not been met. If, however, the cabinet has probable cause to believe
that an immediate threat to the public health, safety, or welfare exists, the cabinet
may take emergency action pursuant to KRS 13B.125. All administrative hearings
conducted under authority of KRS 199.892 to 199.896 shall be conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(5) If, upon inspection or investigation, the inspector general finds that a child-care
Page 1 of 10
BR172500.100 - 1725 - XXXX 2/12/2026 2:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1725
center licensed under this section has violated the administrative regulations
promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A by[, standards, or requirements
of] the cabinet, the inspector general shall issue a statement of deficiency to the
center containing:
(a) A statement of fact;
(b) A statement of how an administrative regulation[, standard, or requirement of
the cabinet] was violated; and
(c) The timeframe, negotiated with the child-care center, within which a violation
is to be corrected, except that a violation that poses an immediate threat to the
health, safety, or welfare of children in the center shall be corrected in no
event later than five (5) working days from the date of the statement of
deficiency.
(6) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services, in consultation with the Office of the
Inspector General, shall establish by administrative regulations promulgated in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A an informal dispute resolution process through
which a child-care provider may dispute licensure deficiencies that have an adverse
effect on the child-care provider's license.
(7) A child-care center shall have the right to appeal to the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services under KRS Chapter 13B any action adverse to its license or the
assessment of a civil penalty issued by the inspector general as the result of a
violation contained in a statement of deficiency within twenty (20) days of the
issuance of the action or assessment of the civil penalty. An appeal shall not act to
stay the correction of a violation.
(8) In assessing the civil penalty to be levied against a child-care center for a violation
contained in a statement of deficiency issued under this section, the inspector
general or the inspector general's designee shall take into consideration the
following factors:
Page 2 of 10
BR172500.100 - 1725 - XXXX 2/12/2026 2:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1725
(a) The gravity of the threat to the health, safety, or welfare of children posed by
the violation;
(b) The number and type of previous violations of the child-care center;
(c) The reasonable diligence exercised by the child-care center and efforts to
correct the violation; and
(d) The amount of assessment necessary to assure immediate and continued
compliance.
(9) Upon a child-care center's failure to take action to correct a violation [of the
administrative regulations, standards, or requirements of the cabinet ]contained in a
statement of deficiency, or at any time when the operation of a child-care center
poses an immediate threat to the health, safety, or welfare of children in the center,
and the child-care center continues to operate after the cabinet has taken emergency
action to deny, suspend, or revoke its license, the cabinet or the cabinet's designee
shall take at least one (1) of the following actions against the center:
(a) Institute proceedings to obtain an order compelling compliance with the
administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A[, standards, and requirements of the cabinet];
(b) Institute injunctive proceedings in Circuit Court to terminate the operation of
the center;
(c) Institute action to discontinue payment of child-care subsidies; or
(d) Suspend or revoke the license or impose other penalties provided by law.
(10) Upon request of any person, the cabinet shall provide information regarding the
denial, revocation, suspension, or violation of any type of child-care center license
of the operator. Identifying information regarding children and their families shall
remain confidential.
(11) The cabinet shall provide, upon request, public information regarding the
inspections of and the plans of correction for the child-care center within the past
Page 3 of 10
BR172500.100 - 1725 - XXXX 2/12/2026 2:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1725
year. All information distributed by the cabinet under this subsection shall include a
statement indicating that the reports as provided under this subsection from the past
five (5) years are available from the child-care center upon the parent's, custodian's,
guardian's, or other interested person's request.
(12) All fees collected under the provisions of KRS 199.892 to 199.896 for license and
certification applications shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to a
special fund for the purpose of administering KRS 199.892 to 199.896 including the
payment of expenses of and to the participants in child-care workshops. The funds
collected are hereby appropriated for the use of the cabinet. The balance of the
special fund shall lapse to the general fund at the end of each biennium.
(13) Any advertisement for child-care services shall include the address of where the
service is being provided.
(14) All inspections of licensed and unlicensed child-care centers by the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services shall be unannounced.
(15) All employees and owners of a child-care center who provide care to children shall
demonstrate within the first three (3) months of employment completion of at least
a total of six (6) hours of orientation in the following areas:
(a) Basic health, safety, and sanitation;
(b) Recognizing and reporting child abuse; and
(c) Developmentally appropriate child-care practice.
(16) All employees and owners of a child-care center who provide care to children shall
annually demonstrate to the department completion of at least six (6) hours of
training in child development. These hours shall include but are not limited to one
and one-half (1.5) hours one (1) time every five (5) years of continuing education in
the recognition and prevention of pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in KRS
620.020. Training in recognizing pediatric abusive head trauma may be designed in
collaboration with organizations and agencies that specialize in the prevention and
Page 4 of 10
BR172500.100 - 1725 - XXXX 2/12/2026 2:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1725
recognition of pediatric head trauma approved by the secretary of the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services. The one and one-half (1.5) hours required under this
section shall be included in the current number of required continuing education
hours.
(17) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall make available either through the
development or approval of a model training curriculum and training materials,
including video instructional materials, to cover the areas specified in subsection
(15) of this section. The cabinet shall develop or approve the model training
curriculum and training materials to cover the areas specified in subsection (15) of
this section.
(18) Child-care centers licensed pursuant to this section and family child-care homes
certified pursuant to KRS 199.8982 shall not use corporal physical discipline,
including the use of spanking, shaking, or paddling, as a means of punishment,
discipline, behavior modification, or for any other reason. For the purposes of this
section, "corporal physical discipline" means the deliberate infliction of physical
pain and does not include spontaneous physical contact that is intended to protect a
child from immediate danger.
(19) Child-care centers that provide instructional and educational programs for
preschool-aged children that operate for a maximum of twenty (20) hours per week
and that a child attends for no more than fifteen (15) hours per week shall:
(a) Notify the cabinet in writing that the center is operating;
(b) Meet all child-care center licensure requirements and administrative
regulations related to employee background checks;
(c) Meet all child-care center licensure requirements and administrative
regulations related to tuberculosis screenings; and
(d) Be exempt from all other child-care center licensure requirements and
administrative regulations.
Page 5 of 10
BR172500.100 - 1725 - XXXX 2/12/2026 2:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1725
(20) Child-care centers that provide instructional and educational programs for
preschool-aged children that operate for a maximum of twenty (20) hours per week
and that a child attends for no more than ten (10) hours per week shall be exempt
from all child-care licensure requirements and administrative regulations.
(21) Instructional programs for school-age children that offer, whether free or for a fee,
recreational, educational, sports training, or vacation programs that include but are
not limited to martial arts and dance programs to children under eighteen (18) years
of age, that a child attends outside the presence of his or her parent or legal
guardian, shall be exempt from all child-care licensure administrative regulations if
the following criteria are met:
(a) The program provides primary instruction in a skill, talent, ability, expertise,
or proficiency;
(b) The program operates outside the time period when school is in session,
including before or after school hours, holidays, school breaks, teaching
planning days, or summer vacation;
(c) The program does not advertise or otherwise represent that the program is a
licensed child-care center or that the program offers child-care services;
(d) The program informs the parent or guardian:
1. That the program is not licensed by the cabinet; and
2. About the physical risks a child may face while participating in the
program; and
(e) The program conducts the following background checks for all program
employees and volunteers who work with children:
1. Check of the child abuse and neglect records maintained by the cabinet;
and
2. In-state criminal background information check from the Justice and
Public Safety Cabinet or Administrative Office of the Courts.
Page 6 of 10
BR172500.100 - 1725 - XXXX 2/12/2026 2:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1725
(22) Directors and employees of child-care centers in a position that involves
supervisory or disciplinary power over a minor, or direct contact with a minor, shall
submit to a criminal record check in accordance with KRS 199.8965.
(23) A director or employee of a child-care center may be employed on a probationary
status pending receipt of the criminal background check. Application for the
criminal record of a probationary employee shall be made no later than the date
probationary employment begins.
(24) In determining whether to issue a plan of correction, directed plan of correction,
or suspension or revocation of a child-care center license in response to any
alleged violation of an administrative regulation by a child-care center, in
addition to any other required considerations under this section the cabinet shall
consider the following factors:
(a) If the child-care center self-reported the incident in question and if the
child-care center had a history of self-reporting incidents;
(b) If the incident was the result of the child-care center failing in any way
related to policy, training, enforcement, or supervision;
(c) If the incident was the result of an independent act of failure to follow
administrative regulations or center policy on the part of a child-care center
applicant for licensure, a child-care center director, or any staff person;
(d) Actions taken by the child-care center in addition to those required by
administrative regulation, including but not limited to installing cameras,
providing extra training for staff, implementing facility improvements,
enacting safety policies stricter than those required by administrative
regulation, and improving staff-to-child ratios; and
(e) If the child-care center appropriately responded to the violation by holding
the party responsible accountable for the violation and correcting or
initiating correction of any condition that contributed to the violation.
Page 7 of 10
BR172500.100 - 1725 - XXXX 2/12/2026 2:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1725
(25) A violation of a directed plan of correction shall not result in a suspension or
revocation of a child-care center's license unless the violation is solely
determined by the cabinet to be serious enough to justify the suspension or
revocation.
(26) A child-care center shall be permitted to provide requested documentation to the
cabinet up to five (5) business days following a request when any routine review
or audit related to an alleged violation of administrative regulation occurs.
(27) (a) A child-care center that has been granted a preliminary license with a six
(6) month probationary period by the cabinet shall receive a minimum of
two (2) weekly support contacts a week by the cabinet, with at least one (1)
contact being in person for each week of a six (6) month probationary
period in order to assist the center owner, supervisors, and staff in
understanding, implementing, and practicing administrative regulations
properly.
(b) During the six (6) month probationary period, the cabinet shall not issue a
violation against a child-care center unless the cabinet determines that a
violation was knowingly committed after the cabinet had provided clear
instructions, or the violation created an immediate threat to the health,
safety, or welfare of the children in the child-care center.
(28) The cabinet may allow but shall not require the inspector general, the inspector
general's designee, or other cabinet representative to:
(a) Take emergency action in accordance with subsection (4) of this section by
issuing an emergency order that suspends a child-care center's license;
(b) Revoke a child-care center's license if an emergency order has been issued
and the:
1. Child-care center has not requested a hearing within the timeframes
required in subsection (7) of this section; or
Page 8 of 10
BR172500.100 - 1725 - XXXX 2/12/2026 2:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1725
2. Condition that resulted in the emergency order is not corrected within
thirty (30) calendar days of service of an emergency order;
(c) Revoke a child-care center's license if:
1. A representative of the child-care center interferes with a cabinet
or other agency representative's ability to perform an official
duty;
2. A cabinet representative, a representative from another agency
with regulatory authority, or a parent is denied access during
operating hours to a child, the child-care center, or child-care
center staff;
3. The child-care center is discontinued or disqualified from
participation in Kentucky's child-care subsidy program or
another governmental assistance program as a result of fraud,
abuse, or criminal conviction related to the center;
4. The child-care center fails to meet a condition of, or violates a
requirement of, a directed plan of correction;
5. The child-care center applicant or licensee knowingly
misrepresents or submits false information on a form required by
the cabinet;
6. The child-care center is the subject of more than two (2) directed
plans of correction during a three (3) year period; or
7. The child-care center has failed to comply with required payment
provisions; and
(d) Suspend a child-care center's license if:
1. A violation of an administrative regulation is found to pose an
immediate threat to the health, safety, and welfare of the
children in care, as permitted in subsection (4) of this section; or
Page 9 of 10
BR172500.100 - 1725 - XXXX 2/12/2026 2:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1725
2. The child-care center fails to comply with the approved plan of
correction.
(29) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to identify emergency care providers who provide essential child-care
services during an identified state of emergency.[
(25) Notwithstanding any state law, administrative regulation, executive order, or
executive directive to the contrary, during the 2020 or 2021 state of emergency
declared by the Governor in response to COVID-19, including but not limited to
any mutated strain of the COVID-19 virus, the cabinet shall not establish any
restrictions on capacity for class or group size or the ability to combine classes and
groups for capacity limits in the morning or afternoon that is below the number that
was in effect on February 1, 2020.]
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply:
(1) To any pending and not yet final action related to licensed child-care centers
that is under consideration by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services on the effective
date of this Act; and
(2) To any action related to licensed child-care centers that occurs on or after the
effective date of this Act.
Section 3. Whereas it is essential that the General Assembly promptly provide
access to adequate and quality child care in the Commonwealth in order to provide for
the health and safety of citizens, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes
effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a
law.
Page 10 of 10
BR172500.100 - 1725 - XXXX 2/12/2026 2:33 PM Jacketed